Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1502
Election falsification; penalty.

A person shall be guilty of election falsification if, orally or in writing, he or she purposely states a falsehood under oath lawfully administered or in a statement made under penalty of election falsification (1) as to a material matter relating to an election in a proceeding before a court, tribunal, or public official or (2) in a matter in relation to which an oath or statement under penalty of election falsification is authorized by law, including a statement required for verifying or filing a voter registration application or voting early or a statement required by a new or former resident to enable him or her to vote for President or Vice President of the United States. Any person committing election falsification shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 401;

Laws 2005, LB 98, § 30;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 55.